


Exactly where those commendable words were earlier when they could avoid the indiscretion…



“Devil, is this a devil? Shizu, Shizu, I’m scared…”



“Just don’t look… Suzu, Maybe if you can’t see him…”



“It’s dicey, Kouki He’s being unexpected and imposing again.



“So it’s a demon who looks like a man.”



Shizuku and company looked in horror at Hajime’s demonic appearance. Ryuutaro looked like he had seen true terror. Hajime was the kind of guy they should defeat as a hero, heroes driven by a sense of mission.



On the other hand, Yue and her group spoke up.



“Nnn…. Hajime, nice.”



“He is doing good!”



“Master ah… a glance like that. Would you only direct that eye towards your mistress?”



“… Hajime-kun… Manly…”



If something could be said of the situation, Love is blind? No matter how you look at it, Hajime’s face looked evil. However, to Yue and company it only served to charm them and make their hearts race. It was too late for them in a lot of ways.



Kaori wore a complex expression on her face at the sight of a belligerent Hajime. She had seen Hajime fight on in desperate situations before like in the Melusine Underwater Ruins. Seeing him like this reminded her of why she fell for him in the first place.



Looking at Kaori in such a situation, Koaki’s party looked at her as if the distance between them had become all the greater.



Suzu, after seeing Hajime’s fighting spirit and determination to annihilate the room full of slime, also diverted her line of sight. Even she couldn’t handle the sight of his heinous expression. That was normal, wasn’t it?



At that time, a tremendous roar echoed across the outside of the barrier. It was the sound of rocks cracking. The sound of destruction rang out in bigger and bigger succession. It sounded like the continuous burst of a firecracker, the roar beyond comparison. That was the carpet bombing started with Hajime’s cross bit.



The milky white slime covering the barrier started to writhe. Hajime becomes covered in a sheer crimson light. Yue admired it. Hajime wasn’t aware of it, single-mindedly focused on controlling the cross bits on the outside of the barrier.



The sea of slime had turned into a burning hell, reflecting in the magic stone eye behind his eye patch.



Hajime had spread black tar on the ceiling, creating blackrain that ran down from the ceiling, polluting the milky white slime below, while the Getsurin added in sprinkling tar across the sea of slime.



After enough tar had saturated the slime, the cross-bits began to drop cluster bombs. Each of the holes Hajime had created were packed full of small explosives and burning powder, the contents of each was enough to destroy a small house.



The cluster bombs ignited one after another, the slime sea undergoing one explosion after another, tearing the slimes into various small pieces. The explosive flame flooded across the sea, creating a lake of fire 3000°C in a prison of flame ignited by tar.



A tremendous amount of heat licked across the ground, rising into the air in a spire of scarlet. The milky white slime continued to burn, helpless to escape the heat. Hajime’s murderous intent spread out, creating a world of scarlet that consumed everything. The trees were baked, the ground was melted, and the air was scorched. The Jukai forest was completely consumed.



A gap in the barrier finally became noticeable as milky slime fell away, burning red. Someone noticed it and raised a voice, only to realize that the barrier of slimes was replaced with a sea of flame, and the white slimes were quickly turned to ash.



Before long, the milky white around them had become completely eliminated. There was nothing left but a few puddles of tar on the ground.



“I ~, It seems like they were devoured.”



“Looks like we no longer need the barrier.”



Yue nodded in confirmation.



“We should maintain it a bit more. There might be a few still lurking around.”



When Hajime stated so, countless black objects from the ceiling came down in a suite with a constant speed. It was the spider golems, which were lowering from hanging threads from the ceiling.



“It comes!?”



The spectacle of dozens of spider golems coming from the ceiling caused some of the party to shout out in surprise. After they realized what it was, they blushed in embarrassment, although those that recognized what they were only grinned.



The spider golems landed on the ground and began drilling once again into the floor and giant trees in the same way they had chewed up the ceiling.



Hajime finally affords some of his concentration to talk to the group.



“It’ll take some time to finish drilling all the giant trees. I don’t know how many slime there are out there. It’d be nice if we didn’t face any trouble once we leave the barrier, so we can take some time to finish up here. In that case, Yue, if you could leave the barrier up for just a bit longer.”



“…. Nn.”



While concentrating on operating the spider golems, Hajime instructed Yue who readily agreed. Either way, the crisis seemed to be over and everyone started to relax.



Kaori was already helping remove the white fluid from the other girls, ending their indecent appearance. However, Ryuutaro vowed to never forget.



Hajime continued to drill to the extent that it wouldn’t disturb their journey the rest of the way to the giant trees. He sat cross-legged in place. In was a cardinal rule of an adventurer to rest when you could rest.



The others saw him rested and committed to resting themselves as well.



At that time, a soft weight press onto Hajime’s back. Looking back over his shoulders, Hajime sees the figure of Yue there. She was hugging him from behind. She was spoiling Hajime as usual and put on a small smile for him.



“Ah… Hajime, something strange, Ah, really, I want that too Hajime.”



“What, no, what are you talking about. Yue? Together in such a circumstance?”



Yue’s breath is rough. Her lovely eyes were just a bit misted, and she was licking her lips. Any way you look at it, she was aroused.



If they were at an inn for the night, Hajime might have rejoiced, but this was clearly not the time right now.



To get aroused so suddenly in this situation, it seemed impossible. There was something abnormal with Yue right now. Hajime examined Yue with a serious look. Yue’s body was hot and trembling. Her body was pressed up against his with an impatience that even made it hard for Hajime.



Hajime shakes his head in wonder watching Yue’s condition before the shadow of the other girls caught his attention. He looked to where Shia was.



“Hajime… me… me, already… ah.”



“Shia, you too?”



“Ah, Hajime, I like, I like you.”



“Wait, just wait.”



Shia prevented escape by sandwiching Hajime’s arm between her thighs and chest and hugging his right arm, rubbing his body. Obviously, it’s the same symptoms as Yue. Cheeks red, respiration high, pupils look hazy with animal passion. It’s like they had been shot with a full throttle of sex appeal. Hajime felt a little dizzy from the smell.



“What on earth…”



Hajime stared at them with a bewildered look. There was another figure that was acting the same way as Yue and Shia.



Kaori also had directed an eye towards Hajime, writhing unbearably. Kaori crawls towards him little by little on all fours, aligning hesitantly and rubbing Hajime’s legs. Tio even…



Koaki’s group were no exception. Ryuutaro’s pupils were hollow, and he was writhing uncomfortably. As if losing his senses, he creeps up next to Suzu as she hugs herself in a slouch. Meanwhile, Kouki is giving Shizuku a side glance with bloodshot eyes. He finally stands, approaching Shizuku with a hand extended towards her.



The problem was that Shizuku was acting in a very similar way. She was writhing in spot, stiff and unmoving, while biting her upper lip. She was silent, but had a tinge of red on her cheeks. It wouldn’t do to have them have to endure this situation. Once everyone regained their senses, it might be too late.



It was hard to tell what was really going on in Kouki’s mind, but there was lust in his eyes. Suzu is shivering and suffering, and Ryuutaro tries to catch her as she falls to the ground. As he called out her name, it was clear his intentions weren’t noble.



“Shit, this is from the essence of the slime.”



Hajime pulls out two cursed bora artifacts from the “treasure room” and slaps them on the wrists of Ryuutaro and Kouki. They seemed to be causing the worst problem. Shizuku and Suzu were delirious, even calling out Kaori and Yue’s names in their fervor. The artifacts used some kind of restriction spatial magic.



It seemed like the situation was safe for a second, then Suzu started to extend a hand toward Shizuku. The expression was one that shouldn’t show on a girl’s face. It was the kind of important expression you only showed to the one you had your heart set on.



Hajime’s clicked his tongue in annoyance, throwing another bora on Suzu as well.



“Oh… is master safe? It looks like that slime’s mucus is a powerful aphrodisiac.” Tio explains.



While restraining Suzu, he stops Kaori as she reaches out to cling to his left arm. Tio begins to move towards him at a steady pace with a calm look.



Hajime looks up at her.



To Hajime’s surprised, she begins to talk as if normal.



“My magic is being obstructed by the feeling of intense pleasure. Soon, I might lose my consciousness and be blinded by the pleasure. This is more than just a troublesome thing. Since it wasn’t just a little, I was bathed in it, it’ll be impossible to resist. If the battle had been prolonged, it would have been complete destruction. Even if we survived, the after effects would become… rather dangerous.”



“Oh, Oh, yeah…”



“Hmm, probably, the goal of this test is to endure pleasure and overcome difficulties together, or to let bonds be defeated by pleasure. In any case, the “liberators” played a really nasty trick. They probably didn’t expect someone like past with such a high poison resistance.”



“Tio….”



“What can I say? It’s very much like master.”



Hajime, while agreeing with Tio’s predictions, gave out a bigger question while eyeing Yue and the others.



“You guess that it was the slime’s mucus that caused this situation… it’s safe to think that. But why are you so calm? You got hit with more mucus than anyone.”



“Certainly, the liquid is affecting this mistress. In fact, my body is greatly affected by it. I’m thinking right now that I’d like master to lick me.”



“Tio…”



Tio throws out her chest, giving Hajime a wide eye look as she flashes a beautiful smile.



Although Tio is being violated by intense pleasure, she’s keeping her senses by the power of her will. It seemed to be a sense of pride. Hajime wondered how long she’d be able to keep it up. After all, she was hit with a lot of aphrodisiac…



“Mistress is her master’s slave. Compared with the degree of pleasure the pain you give me causes, this is only lukewarm. Now if you wanted to hit me I wouldn’t be able to take it anymore.”



“Is that so…”



Eyes! Kuwa! Hajime eyes turned sour and looked at her as if she was dirt. Tio, who could even shake the pleasure of the slime, began to shiver uncontrollably.



“As expected of Ms. Tio. Do you mind keeping your distance from me?”



“Oh no, to think you’d call me so indifferently and distantly. Ah… this is bad, the pleasure.”



Tio was calm a little while ago, but the rapidly growing pleasure of Hajime’s disgust quickly defeated her. She was brought to all fours, painting desperately. From such a sight, Hajime turned away and looked at Yue, who was hugging his body while trembling.



He decided to talk to the three he trusted the most.



Yue, Shia, Kaori. You guy’s shouldn’t be that overtaken by a slime like this? You’re keeping things in control, right?



The three of them look up at Hajime, their cheeks stained red, their breath coming out in hot puffs as they cling to him desperately.



“Nn… is natural.”



“uu, of course, yoo- “



“It’s okay. I’m fine!”



They resisted the intense desire that tempted them to devote themselves to pleasure. Yue and the others were keeping it together with clenched teeth. After a look at the girls, Hajime laughs with satisfaction.



“This is one of the disgusting trials prepared for the great labyrinth. If you think for a second you can’t take it, look at the others. Don’t lose to them, it’d be embarrassing?”



Amongst his speech, Yue’s mouth distorted into a fearless smile.



“There is a way to fix this immediately, of course. I’m holy water to drink. That would quickly change out state. There are no things that can’t be released. How about…”



Hajime and the two others respond at the same time before she can finish talking.



“… unnecessary.”



“I do not need.”



“I don’t need that.”



They decided to get over the trial without any help. If “help” was “that”. Hajime gave a soft look. Yue, Shia, and Kaori give him happy smiles, because Hajime believed in them.



He still tried to help by keep a distance between the three women. This wasn’t something that would be easy for them to endure.



However…



“Hajime hug is gone…” Shia whined.



“It isn’t harder for you?”



“It’s harder not the embrace Hajime.” Kaori explained.



“As she said, because a heart calms down… so please…” Shia said.



Hajime thought that it’d be a problem if he held them, but found himself holding all three in his arms. On his right arm is Shia, his left his Kaori, and Yue was held in the front on his lap.



They occasionally trembled with shivers, but Yue and the others devoted themselves to controlling their rough breathing and finally began to feel relief.



If they concentrated with their eyes closed, they could maintain and balance their spirit. Soon, the three excited women body temperatures began to drop and their heartbeats returned to normal. They seemed to be able to whether this trial without a problem as well. Hajime avoided moving his body even slightly as to not stimulate them. He smiled a little and kept supporting the three woman.



“I like this master, may your mistress also come over there?” Tio speaks up.



“Clearly that’s a joke… Ms. Clarce.”



“I’m falling down… oh, so cold. I’m done for.”





Chapter 130




The “saint shield” barrier finally dissipated as the outside blaze consumed the remainder of the tar and extinguished. The only remaining vegetation adhered to a strangely metallic ground covered with ash. It looked like an apocalyptic landscape.



“…Hmm?”



“How’s everyone?”



“Oh?”



Hajime sat in the middle of the burnt out wasteland with Yue, Shia, and Kaori holding him tightly with their eyes closed. They each opened their eyes in turn and tilted their heads.



“Oh? What’s the matter?”



Hajime asked with a worried voice as he noticed a strange look on Yue. Yue and the other girls looked at each other, acknowledging what they all had to gone through before nodding and turning to Hajime.



“…Nn, we endured.”



“Yes, the pleasure seems to be gone.”



“I also don’t feel anything, I’m back to my senses.”



It seems to be that way.



They seemed to have endured the aphrodisiac effect of the milky slime that took their sanity with their mental strength. Excessive pleasure wasn’t all that different from pain. Hajime couldn’t imagine how much Yue and the others had suffered from an attack unlike any other they’ve ever experienced.



Hajime praised the three of them for doing a good job passing the labyrinth’s ordeal.



“As expected, all three of you did a good job. I was worried for a bit but I’m glad you’re okay.”



“Nn… Kufufu.”



“Ehehehe, it’s embarrassing to be told that so forwardly.”



“It’s thanks to Hajime-kun. It was your support that allowed me to endure.”



Hajime no longer had to hug the three as they were no longer under the effect of the aphrodisiac. Nevertherless, they didn’t let go as they grew gitty over being praised by Hajime.



Hajime tried to loosen his grip assuming it’d be alright by now, but Yue responded by hugging him even stronger.



Did they need more praising? The three girl looked upward at Hajime with blushing cheeks while they clang to him even more aggressively. They didn’t wear expressions that suggested they had lost their sanity. However, those expressions hold a certain allure of their own.



When they were under the aphrodisiac effect, it was easy for Hajime to reject their approaches, but it was a bit more difficult to resist Yue’s charm when she meant it. He gave up trying to get his arms back.



Then…



“Gohon! Sorry to interrupt you, but since we’re all better now I was wondering if you might untie Kouki and the rest?”



“Oh yeah? You did well too. You managed to make it without help. Indeed, a swordsman? Is this one of those spirit unification techniques?”



“Oh, Shizuku. Ehehe, I’m sorry, At the same time… my Shizuku-chan!”



After everything was over, it looked like Shizuku had managed to escape the pleasurable hell at the same time as Yue and the others, but had a haggard expression when she saw the pink space the group had made beside her. The interruption had managed to disrupt the mood and turn the group back to normal.



The girls who had been basking in Hajime’s praise turned away, slightly embarrassed.



“Oh, thank you. Well, I was able to keep calm since my father hammered self-control into me since a young age during fencing. But it was a little dangerous. I mean, I wonder if things would have turned out this way if Kouki and the rest weren’t constrained. I survived because I had the room to concentrate, without having to worry about defending myself. Thank you, Nagumo-kun. ”



“That’s good to hear. The pleasure could have knocked you unconscious. Enduring pleasure in place of pain could do that. While I prepare, Yaegashi, you might want to fix your clothes and mud situation.”



“Clothes? Mud? Oh… yeah. I understand.”



At first, Shizuku did not understand what Hajime had meant, but when she glanced down at herself she noticed that a change of clothes was in order. (It was sweat, Shizuku was just covered in sweat!) She blushed at the comment, nodding tightly.



Hajime used his transmutation to create several simple dressing rooms built from a wall of soil. The “Treasure room” had changes of clothing for Kouki and Ryuutaro as well (clothes bought in town). He took them out and tossed one over to Shizuku. Hajime collected the Bora Cursed Objects from Kouki’s group, releasing them.



Kouki’s group immediately drop. Shizuku managed to catch Suzu before she hit the ground, but Kouki and Ryuutaro collapsed to the ground with a rather painful noise. It was the hero and his sidekick, so Hajime had no worries.



While the female teammates used water magic to clean up and changed their clothing, Hajime concentrated on collecting all the spider golems.



They had finished destroying the ground around the immediate vicinity. There would be no Milky Slime coming out of the ground in surprise this time. These extra measures seemed necessary after the amount of time the milky slimes has previously wasted.



“You… master. I wouldn’t mind if you looked at this mistress. There is no need for a locker room.” At that point, a voice timidly came from behind.



Tio had managed to break through the aphrodisiac effect readily even though she had received the most slime.



Hajime recalls the fact and glances back at Tio.



“Were you still there, Ms. Clarce?”



“!? Please Master! You’re still doing that? It was certainly pleasant to begin with, but can you go back to the usual way of naming me!”



“That, what are you even talking about? As usual, Ms. Clarce is Ms. Clarce. Please don’t get any closer to me.”



“!!!!? Please, Master. I’m getting too excited. I’m repenting, please turn back!”



“……”



As Tio crawls up to his feet and scratches at his shoe, Hajime looks away and ignores her. The distant attitude by calling her with her last name and treating her like she was invisible were unbearable for Tio. Hajime was happy about this, Tio seemed genuinely saddened by this treatment, it looked like he found an effective punishment whenever she acted up.



Tio was trembling as she watched Hajime. By any chance, did Hajime go too far? Her look was becoming more and more tearful.



“This is a terrible master. I ask… call me Tio.”



Hajime had dealt a blow to stunt Tio’s abnormal behavior at last; it was a very satisfactory feeling.



However, Tio’s rueful appearance wasn’t the transformation Hajime was hoping for, destroying her beautiful appearance in her deteriorating kimono. Hajime’s devious heart considered things a little more, whether he punished her objectively, it seemed to be the role of a master. Happy or not, she wasn’t aware of it.



“It’s pointless, Tio. It’s already too late for you to change the kind of person you are, so at least be a little prudent.”



While Hajime shrugged while saying so, Tio was dumbfounded. Her expression brightened, and she gave a smile that looked like it belonged to a sweet, young girl. That smile was beautiful enough to tug on even Hajime’s heartstrings.



She was knowledgeable and could have some deep thoughts, understanding the subtleties of the human mind. Understanding someone and making an effort when she could have lost her composure. She had courage and decisiveness, unmatched combat strength. She was affectionate and kept her word. And her appearance was the best. If it wasn’t for her abnormality, you could say she was a “perfect woman”.



“Really, it is a shame… Because in a sense, I…”



“?”



It seemed like Hajime had opened a new door for Tio. He felt partially responsible for her abnormality but he was helpless to fight it.



“What’s is it? Master…”



“…No, nothing. Go get changed and freshen up.”



“Yikes, it’s a… That’s okay then, master? For me to change right here in the corner?”



When Hajime planned for Tio to use the makeshift changing room, Tio gave an expectant look and said such a thing.



Hajime’s cheek twitched as he wondered “where’s that prudence?” and pulled out a grenade.



“…How about this? It’s a special present for you. It’ll blow the dirt away along with your skin!”



“!? I get it. I’ll go change my clothes immediately!”



Tio waved her hands and dived into the dressing room. The words “responsibility” and the horological serpant flickered in Hajime’s mind as he watched her back. He shook his head to drive the characters out of his mind.



Others began to emerge from the dressing room after cleaning themselves. Sure enough, Kouki, Suzu, and most of all Ryuutaro emerged with downtrodden looks. They were all hunched as if burdened by unbearably heavy stones, and the atmosphere was wrapped with dark clouds as if magic was being used.



Although they had lost their sanity during the aphrodisiac effect, they seemed to remember what they’d done. Pleasure followed by hell, it seemed that Tio was right when she predicted this would try the bonds of relationships, Kouki’s group seemed proof of that.



Ryuutaru and Kouki couldn’t meet the girl’s eyes and Suzu seemed determined to keep her distance. Suzu kept to the shadows with their heads down and red ears. Hajime feared he’d need to follow up with Suzu if they couldn’t figure things out on their own.



Because they nearly sexually assaulted each other, it made them uncomfortable and provided a sense of guilt that couldn’t be ignored. In particular, Suzu was a girl. The fact that she could have started that kind of relationship with her peer caused a certain kind of damage to her spirit.



“Let’s just forget it, Suzu…? It was unavoidable. Things didn’t go too far… so… There are one or two memories no one wants to remember, probably…”



“…. Shizu, Shizu.”



“Look! Remember that time I was wondering around the dirty game section without noticing what was for sale? It was serious, the male customers around were all looking at me with judgmental eyes… and I became depressed…”



“Is…. Shizu interested in dirty games?”



“That’s not it! That was an unfortunate accident!”



“Shizu investigating dirty games… kufufu, with a serious look… pukuku.”



“It is terrible to laugh, Suzu.”



Shizuku looked somewhat relieved now that Suzu was laughing.



It seemed like any comfort would work to overcome the dark history sealed in people’s memories, and “sympathy of embarrassment” was a self-torture ingredient necessary to help Suzu’s spirit recover a bit.



As expected of Shizuku, willing to sacrifice herself. It was admirable!



Kouki had his head down, so Suzu watched him.



“Nagumo cared for everyone. We should be thankful he stopped us.”



“Yes, you’re right. We were saved by Nagumo. I’m serious. Thank you very much.” Ryuutaro who seemed to be uncomfortable following Kouki turned his eyes to Hajime and expressed his thanks.



“Be thankful. Make sure to remember that. Always be conscious of your debt. So that when you’re better, you can return it to me by resolving to be an appropriate meat shield. If I make a mistake, it’ll be fine. Because I’ll go to the ends of the Earth to make sure you repay it.”



Hajime came off more like a Yakuza business lending out money at 11 to 1. When someone skipped a payment, they really did go to any length to make them pay. A thank you didn’t seem to be the kind of payment he was looking for.



The church or someone like Nointo might want Kouki’s party to become his enemy (no matter how hopeless). So he wanted to keep them conscious of the debt, just in case.



But not really knowing what was on Hajime’s mind, Kouki’s group had twitching cheeks and disturbed expressions like cheat victims who had just found themselves consumed by an unreasonable debt.



It certainly mad a big debt in that sense unless they could stop relying on Hajime. They recognized that and gave each other a silent nod.



However, the awkwardness seemed to clear up after the speech that trampled the common sense of Hajime.



The thought of the debt collector coming to make unreasonable demands seemed to inspire Kouki and Ryuutaro, and apparently Suzu and Shizuku as well. In a sense, they felt unity over not wanting to be consumed by debt, burying the break between them a bit.



Without being attacked by any more Milky slimes, they advanced across the wasteland with ease and finally arrived at the giant tree. The gather at the entrance and step into the next magic circle.



__________________________



The place where Hajime and company appeared was as expected. However, the light being emitted from it was different from usual. There was a doorway leading to the outside and was open from the beginning.



Hajime glanced around, seeing that he wasn’t missing a single member. The magic eye could not detect the present of any fakes. In other words, they needed to proceed as is.



Hajime cautiously moved forward towards the exit bathed in light as Hajime gave everyone else a nod.



“This is… like fair Bergen.” Hajime looks ahead and nods as so.



Yue and the others had similar impressions and nodded.



Ahead of the cave exit was an aisle, or rather a huge branch that could easily be mistook for an aisle. When Hajime glanced back, he could see a huge wooden trunk that went back so far he couldn’t see the end. In other words, the empty cave came at the root of a branch that Hajime and the others were on.



The tree was too big, and the branch made a 5 meter across aisle just as it is. Other big branches protrude from the tree intertwining here and there. It was an air corridor in the same way as Fair Bergen.



Unlike Fair Bergen, it was a single branch growing from the tree and intertwine to make the air space, as opposed to a several groupings of branches.



If you look up, there is a stone ceiling, so they were definitely still underground. This tree branch was likely part of the Great Tree as Hajime couldn’t imagine there being any other giant trees like this.



“…Great Tree?”



“It’s likely this is a space just under the Great Tree.”



“But the Great Tree is visible on the ground.”



“Well, it seems to grown branches below the ground. The real roots might be much deeper underground. We only see the tip that’s visible, it might be just a small part.”



“How big does the Great Tree get?”



Overtaken by the min-boggling enormity of the Great Tree, it was almost too great to contemplate. The ceiling obstructed the view ahead, but Hajime still imagined the tree towering above them.



Shia’s Usamimi twitch and begin to move. Shia’s appeared to pick up some kind of sound. Shia wonders “What’s that sound?” and sets out to verify the identity while walking the distance of the branches.



The faint sound is leathery and her ears flop around with disgust. Shia frowns as her Usamimi pick up the sound, an imperceptible sound that sent goosebumps across her skin. She peers over the edge cautiously.



“? Dark and invisible, that’s it.”



‘What’s the matter?”



“I’m hearing a somewhat unpleasant sound, but it’s too dark for my eyes…”



“You want me to look for you?”



“Yes, thank you. What is that? The sound of such a feeling, like wriggling.”



“I understand, something theta sounds disgusting?”



Hajime glanced over the edge on the left of the branch passage after shea called. Certainly, the darkness could not be pierced at this particular height, but with “night eyes” and “far vision” it wouldn’t be a problem for Hajime.



“…!?”



First, Hajime can’t see everything, but as he narrows his eyes doubtfully he gives out a cry that couldn’t be voiced. He looked up, his face blue and his expression giving away danger.



“Ha, Hajime!? What’s wrong? To see you react so much. What exactly did you see?”



“…Hajime, okay?”



Hajime was the height of fearless arrogance and boldness. For Hajime’s face to display fear gave something very difficult to imagine. Yue anxiously rubbed Hajime’s back. Shia was holding his hand gently.



Hajime finally recovered as bit of warmth and murmured while trembling and overlooking everyone with a serious look.



.”…The devil is there…”



“Demon?” x5



Everyone inclined their necks at Hajime’s pointless words. Kouki and Ryuutaro turned their eyes from Hajime, who to them looks most like the devil himself, to declare something else a devil, gave them watery eyes.



“Yes, it’s a devil. It’s black and you know it well…”



When he said only that, Hajime pulled out a crossbit and sent it down. A small crystal was put up so that everyone could see.



The one which reflected after a little noise right in front of Yue and others was…



“!?” x5



If you find one, there is at least thirty more. It bears the name of the black devil, having been feared with the word inititals G. Always creeps, rustling by chaos, life force causing it to doggedly survive, struggling in the shadows moving at high speed. If you are flying in the air, the Earth, enemy of the strong which cause abnormalities in a state of confusion and panic in restaurants, they are soldiers of unique magic.



The name of… cockroach.



The cockroach is, at the bottom of this underground space, millions, several tens of millions, no their wriggling had no measurement. It was an incomparable sea of cockroaches. The leathery unpleasant sound was the sound of cockroaches rubbing against each other.



“So, what things… look…”



“Yeah, so many, lots and lots.”



With blue faces, Suzu and Shizuku look away as well. They both have goosebumps n their arms. The other members were pretty much the same. In particular, Shea’s Usamimi’s were now hanging down, she was desperate to cover up the sound now that she knew what it was. She buries her head in her hands and squats down, her eyes teary.



“….Hajime, will burn them.”



Yue unusually says a dangerous thing, but Tio and Kaori seemed to already have the same intention. Their desire to so the things destroyed were indicated by the look in the eyes and the goosebumps on their skin.



“It might be better to stop… that number? I suggest… what if they flew in large quantities?”



“……” x3



Thousands of cockroaches coming flying all at once up at them, Hajime proposed. Yue lost her fighting spirit, and her face changed into a complicated expression. Apparently, the heart was broken in an instant.



“If we don’t fall, I think it’s okay. I think… as… I’ll advance first and stop any that come up quickly. It might only attack when we stop.”



Everyone wore a more serious expression that they previously had at Hajime’s words, they gave firm nods.



Hajime traveled out on top of the thick branch passage. For now, there was only the goal of advancing along the road, but since the place was major scaffolding, there appeared to be a joined branch passage in the distance which he supposed was where he was going to aim.



Along the way, the roaches had not jumped up or been startled and they had made it from the entry branch to the next branch aisle. Things looked good, and then…



A feared sound was heard.



Vu… vuvuvuvuvuvuvuvuvuvu!!!



It was flapping sounds, in a large amount.



“!?”



Hajime who confirms with a look below. Sure enough, a brown tsunami was coming stretching out and rising as flapping hordes of cockroaches emerged with a furious spectacle.



“Uo… it’s covered!!”



“Hey, oh, oh oh!!”



“Hyiii!!”



“Come now, oh, oh!”



“—-!!”



Everyone was raising cries of disgust as they prepared for the biggest attack of their lives.



Hajime shoots rockets from Orukan. Yue uses her “thunder dragon”, Shia fights with burst slug ammunition out of the Doryukken, Tio invokes breath, and Kaori released decomposition while Kouki’s group uses whatever long distance attacks they could muster.



Blooming flowers of crimson perched below, roars of thunder. Spreading ripples of blue light, cut blank flashes of black and silver. It wouldn’t be an exaggeration to declare overwhelming annihilation. If this force was put in front of the kingdom and the imperial army, surely, they would oblige to leave this world.



However, the attack didn’t dent the mountainside of blossoming black tsunami coming towards them. Attacking the sea itself is the same as pointless. The tsunami of cockroaches jumped freely in the movement spread throughout space as birds do in perfect order.



“It is terrible! Holy shield!””



Already half crying, Suzu put up a barrier.



Shortly after, the Zaa Aaaa continued move up into the sky. A wave of cockroaches descended as if attracted by gravity and pounced towards Hajime’s party.



The roaches hit the walls, the momentum causing tons to smoosh and sprinkle their fluids as the survivors crawl all over the barrier wall.



“No, ri…”



Suzu’s barrier stretched under the weight and she started to lose consciousness. Kouki resists and tries to give out an encouraging voice over the desperation.



“Suzu, don’t pass out. If you become unconscious we all die. Keep up your spirit!”



Which was part of the attack. To be swallowed by the wave of cockroaches in flesh and blood, but it’s an attack on the spirit as much as a magical attack. These kind of abnormalities couldn’t be avoided. On the contrary, they could traumatize you for life.



“Yue, take over the defense!”



“…Nn, will absolutely not be broken.”



Yue deployed her holy shield to superimpose the one Suzu had raised up with an arm covered in goosebumps. The outside of the barrier was stained black with cockroaches crawling and rustling.



“Somehow, it has been like this since I came to this labyrinth.”



“Extremely messy huge labyrinth. Well, this on assumes you’ve beaten several of these others and have obtained their cheats so it raises the difficulty up several steps.”



“It would be very difficult if you did not have time to analyze things calmly.”



“Kaori, it’s okay, there is no problem. That out there is just a black sesame thing. Black sesame pudding or black sesame furikake and I quite like it. Especially black sesame furikake seasoning soy sauce flavored”. That’s delicious. Rice is great.”



“Shizuku-chan! Oh no! I broke the already fragile Shizuku-chan.”



Kaori gives a heartbreaking cry as Suzu’s pupils go dead. Meanwhile, Hajime reaches into the “treasure room” and starts preparing for extermination while rubbing the goosebumps on his arms.



However, before that happens.



The cockroaches that flocked to the barrier drew in unison. The wave of cockroach in front of everything move into a sphere of air, producing a circular ring to surround the center.



Superimposed further circular rings on the outer periphery of the giant circular ring form. The next cockroach column begins to sequence around the ring. Gradually, the sight begins to form a geometric pattern created in air. Hajime’s cheek twitched.



“Hey, Hey, Hey, believe it or not. Are they forming a magic circle?”



Once a magic circle was formed by Nointo handling and lining up its Gunba formerly in the air. The countless cockroaches were now doing the same thing. Hajime and the other’s declared “how gross” and continued their attack simultaneously.



However, the wave of cockroaches lay ahead so that the spear in the center of the magic circle was maintained.



It’ll be a meat wall literally, and Hajime’s and the others attacks were obstructed. A dead body of the cockroaches where were blown away fell in a torrential downpour into the lower part, but this did not decrease the number at all.



While continuing to fight in this way, the magic circle seemed to be completed. Close to fifteen meters in diameter it floated in the air, a magic circle emitting light of intense red and black. And when it burst the next moment, a central sphere which consists of cockroaches began to rise and change shape. It was a huge cockroach of about three meters at full length, at last.



But rather than taking the oval form as cockroaches around it, it came with a needle like tail and a torso similar to a centipede, complete with 10 legs. Its front feet had sharp finger like knives. The face had black color eyes, and a sharp chin, along with three pairs, six total translucent wings. Perhaps this was a monster of the boss class.



“Gigi Chchichichichichichi chip!!!”



The boss cockroach wore dark red phosphorescent color and emits unpleasant cries. Then the cockroaches gathered around further, beginning to for another magic square. Apparently the boss cockroach could control the other cockroaches. A rather small sphere begins to be formed, plenty in the center of a new magical center. It isn’t the boss cockroach, but it’s clear that a special cockroach appears big.



“Tch… what to do?”



“….Nn!?”



Suddenly a torrent of the magic generated the moment Hajime and Yue tried to make an attack on the magic circle from their footing.



The both turned their eyes down immediately, but there was nothing in a branch aisle to hold. However, his magic eye caught that further down the branch aisle, on the other side of the aisle, out of sight, the cockroaches were forming another magic circle.



It was trying to focus their attention on it, probably forming a magic flash to hide the other circle. Bad Hajime! It was actuated already the moment Hajime realized that.



Red and black magic was transmitted through the branch passage along the scaffold. Hajime protected his face from the intense light. After the flash exploded, it wrapped the surrounding region and settled there. Hajimei and the others appeared intact.



What on earth was it? Hajime looked next to him to Yue while suspecting.



“……”



The feeling that welled up within Hajime at that moment was not relief for her safety and was not the usual love, it was…



–It was hate.





Chapter 131




Disgust, no, the best word was hatred. Such a deep, dark feeling, Hajime felt for… Yue.



It was apparent that Yue felt the same way. Her eyes were distorted with a murderous look as she glanced at Hajime as well.



“Yue.”



“…. Hajime.”



They called each other’s names with familiarity, but with a sort of discomfort as well.



“… I completely despise you.”



“…. I feel nothing but hate.”



With strong emotion, the pair pull out weapons and raise them at each other. Hajime aims Donna straight at Yue’s forehead, while Yue lifts up a flame in her right hand. The words “Oh?” and “Who first?” hung in the air like a classic scene in a Yakuza shop.



“Hey, what are you two doing?”



A voice came forth between the two. It was Shia. Her left shoulder holding Doryukken, her posture like she was about to attack, with a very restrained voice.



“Shouldn’t the one you want to kill be me? Don’t be selfish.”



Like Hajime and Yue, Shia stared at them with hate and malice in her eyes.



Hajime also had negative feelings towards Shia that rivaled the murderous feeling he had for Yue. When Hajime gritted his teeth and looked around, he felt death glares from Tio and Kaori as well. They looked at Yue, Shia, and Hajime all with hate-filled eyes.



“Oh, hey guys. What are you guys doing? Nagumo is just Nagumo.”



It’s Kouki. Kouki seems to be protecting Hajime while giving Yue and the others a stern glare. His eyes seem to hold a great deal of affection for Hajime as he accuses the others of acting strange.



Ryuutaro and Suzu did not seem to share any particular strong feelings against Hajime. Rather, Ryuutaro seemed to be giving Kouki a look of disgust. Shizuku also seems to have hate in her eyes when she looks at Hajime, and a condemning look for Kouki, and a downright murderous look for Kaori.



Fortunately, the “holy shield” barrier was still being maintained by Yue. The swarm of roaches had surged again, trying to catch Hajime and rest off-guard during this abnormality, as the group just glared at each other.



More cockroaches gather into magic circles, attempting to create more special cockroaches outside their protective barrier. Another tsunami of cockroaches flies by, buying them a bit of time.



Hajime analyzed the effect of the light magic using “detect magic” and judged it against his changing emotions to take a guess at the situation now.



“Apparently, the light magic we felt a moment ago seems to have reversed our emotions. The intensity is proportional to the strength of the original emotion.”



“… Nn, reasonable conclusion, I unwillingly agree.”



Hajime explains without turning away; Yue agrees with a disgusted look. Even though the feeling is reversed, they didn’t lose their memories. By inferring from memory how they original thought about each other, it was likely the correct guess.



While holding angry looks, no one else raised an objection.



“The extent of this trial… You can still remember, but the emotion has been reversed. It’s difficult to shake off what you remember versus how you feel. It’s a disgusting ordeal. The deeper the bond, the more it’ll try to tear it apart.”



As Tio explained the extent of this trial, she started blushing as she watched the cockroaches crawling on the outer wall, clogging her words. The allure of the cockroaches seem to jam up every one’s words; it was Kaori who managed to put it into words.



“…. look so pretty.”



So that was also a problem. For the black devils that they would hold as enemies, the hate was flipped. Instead of being repulsed, Hajime and the others only felt endeared by the cockroaches. It was only their memories of disliking them that kept their guard up.



Their emotions were inverted. They needed no more evidence to support that conjecture. The allies with the deepest bonds would be cut, their capacity to defend themselves weakened by their hatred. That might be the goal. Especially against these demonic cockroaches, they certainly had to hold on to their disgust.



With the group unable to cooperate, they’d be swallowed by the tsunami of cockroaches, or fall prey to the medium-sized ones about 1 meter in length. These boss cockroaches were being produced one after another.



It wouldn’t go amiss to call this a desperate situation. … However, the current people here were far from ordinary.



“… It’s the mountains of cockroaches I want to kill.”



“… I’d like to kill them, as well as you.”



Hajime and Yue stared out at the cockroaches. Their eyes seemed to penetrate through the cockroaches pressed up against the outer wall, contemplating on the boss cockroach that had created this situation.



“… More than that.”



“… Than that.”



Hajime and Yue’s eyes flashed with brutal glare. Yue, who usually doesn’t show much expression, wore an aggressive look like that of a wild wolf, her eyes narrowed. Dwelling in those eyes was a fierce anger like never before.



“I like to love… man, I want to kill!”



“…. I want to love him and be cherished.”



Two heads reached a boil.



Their anger gushed out, hot like magma. They remembered how they had previously felt for each other. The cockroaches had messed with their feelings. No one should trifle with those important feelings between two people in love.



Even against roaches, dislike and anger weren’t enough to describe the ferocity that they felt for the cockroaches, something that changed to something sadistic. The feelings grew to a bitterness over the nature of the entire labyrinth up to this moment as well.



And Hajime and Yue weren’t the only ones.



Kouki and the others flinched from the pressure of the overwhelming anger emitted from Hajime and Yue, causing them to retreat. But behind them, Shia, Tio, and even Kaori wore eyes red with anger that could only be described as demonic.



Yue opened up the “Holy Barrier”, causing Kouki and the others to caste looks of skepticism and panic. Red magic began to spread out from Hajime’s feet. His lip is lifted, his canine exposed, and a look of absolute murder on his face.



Shortly after,



Zudooon!!



Hajime leaped from the passage like a single bullet, the roar leaving behind a crater in the middle of branch where his feet previously were. Using an ability like “ground shrink”, mixed with “enhanced legs” and “impact change”, his body moved like a bomb with body reinforcement of pure magic. The “body reinforcement” was applied to the whole body, making him harder than steel, and his body was covered in “Lightning Clad” and red magic, appearing like the embodiment of thunder.



Unable to stop Hajime, Suzu’s “Holy Barrier” was easily destroyed from the inside like waste paper. Hajime rushes the boss cockroach with the intent to destroy it.



“I’ll love you until death.”



The boss cockroach couldn’t even react, its visual recognition unable to match the speed of Hajime moving like a madman with a screw loose.



Suddenly, the cockroach didn’t seem so dangerous. Maybe it was because they reverse their feelings, or didn’t expect someone to sneak out during the siege of cockroaches, but this demon boss seemed rather… simple?



Hajime, as the weapon he was, took out his anger on the cockroach, delivering a fatal blow, using the momentum of his rush combined with a knee kick.



GAAAAAAN



With the resounding roar of steel on steel, the boss cockroach disappeared a second later, Hajime appearing in its spot. The boss cockroach had blown away at an unperceivable speed.



Hajime remained in place using the “aerodynamic” to stand still, receiving the glares and murderous intent as he looked at the direction the boss cockroach was blown away.



On the other side, once Hajime had taken off….



Suzu was panicking, desperately trying to bring back the barrier that he had taken out. However, the cockroaches that drew near no longer disgusted her. Was there a good reason to stay away from the cockroaches? In fact, aren’t they desirable? While thinking this, she lost to the spell.



The cockroaches in this labyrinth are just insects… after all.



Yue stood up to fill the fatal gap in Suzu’s actions to rectify the situation.



“Shaking heaven.”



Around Yue and the others, space itself seemed to wave for a moment. She had started to show the full extent of her god-level magic.



Just as the wave of cockroaches was about to reach them, Space began to explode. The tremendous power generated shock waves that crushed into the cockroaches, crushing them in small pieces, and a moment later only sand remained.



Yue was not finished yet. “Five Heaven Dragons.”



The moment that magic name sounded from her lovely voice, thunder, the blue flame, the storm, the snow and ice, the five bodies of dragons appeared. As tens of thousands of cockroaches rushed towards them, Yue’s dragons circled around them with a distinctive roar and were decimated in an instant.



Yue began to float up with the use of her gravity magic without a glance back to the others. Her body began to rush towards the boss cockroach along with the whole body of the dragon in free fall.



As a formation of 200 medium-sized cockroaches made an attack formation against Hajime, Shia blew it away.



Shia, Tio, and Kaori had all realized, much like Yue in the beginning, that their affection for Hajime had been played with. The cockroaches looming above who had chosen to reverse their emotions were met with a fierce anger raging beyond the intentions of the labyrinth. (Translation Note: In other words, don’t mess with the dere or you get the yan.)



Shia lept into the air with magically reinforced legs, scampering across the sky on light blue disks that rippled with beautiful blue light. Also, Tio and Kaori respectively expanded their dragon wings and sliver wings from their backs, leaping up at once as they met glares with the mid-sized cockroaches.



“Oh, hey, I no longer find you repugnant. However, I’ve still decided that you die.”



“That, That’s right. Bug-chan is cute but… I can’t die, and I have to fight as expected, don’t I?”



“Yes, but decapitate them? Such dear creatures?”



“If we don’t kill, then we’ll be killed. We must be strong, and fight strong, so that we aren’t left behind.”



Though, it’s shameful to say that to them, the Cockroaches might as well have been a Chihuahua staring at them with round eyes as they tried to aim for its neck. It was like trying to kill a small dog that you’d loved from birth. It was these messed up and crazy inconsistencies that they had to deal with, but couldn’t help but think that way.



The remaining people from Kouki’s party couldn’t fly freely through the sky, stranding them at the center of the branch passage. They began to fight passively. They battled side by side and shoulder to shoulder with people they didn’t like. It was a troublesome feeling.



~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~



The boss cockroach that had received Hajime’s flying knee kick had flown off into the trunk of the big tree, sinking magnificently and being blown to bits by the furious momentum. An abdomen that would have taken pride as having the strength of steel was pounded radially centering on the part that received the direct hit, whitish body fluid spilling out from the newly formed hole.



“Gichichichichichichichi!”



The boss cockroach made an unpleasant cry sound while swinging its antennae. A group of cockroaches immediately swarm around the boss cockroach, dissolving into its form in an instant, assimilating and curing the injury the boss had sustained. As long as the small cockroaches remained, they’d be able to keep fighting indefinitely.



The boss cockroach picks out a splinter that had embedded itself into the cockroach from the big tree. The cockroach seems bigger now as it lets out an unpleasant sound.



The cockroach eyes glanced around for the one who injured him…



“Still, let me enjoy this a bit more.”



It seemed like hitting the abdomen just cured the impact further. The roaring sound once again came as steel struck steel. Hajime had quietly approached from the side and send in a Yakuza style kick.



The boss cockroach sinks into the trunk again. Hajime began to attack it mercilessly like a wild beast. Do not use weapons. Hajime had no intention on ending the moment. Applying a “magic shockwave” to his fist and reinforcing his body with magic, he quickly undercuts the bosom of the boss cockroach with another and then another.



Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong! Dugong!



Every time a fist in Hajime’s left or right struck, the form of the boss cockroach twists like a toy, but seems unable to escape, its body being embedded into the cracking trunk of the big tree radially. The cockroach is replaced with a glossy black piece of meat and white blood mixed in shattered wood chip.



The boss cockroach was a foe where even if a physiological hate could be held, its form was too dreadful, although it only looked pathetic in its current form.



A moment later red and black light began to emit from the boss cockroach. A great deal of cockroaches appeared in the route behind Hajime’s back, and with a dreadful speed they formed into a magic circle.



Black smoke emerged from the magic circle, overflowing and assaulting Hajime with furious speed.



“…. Tsh.”



Hajime judged that being touched by the black smoke was bad and evacuated with “aerodynamic” and “ground shrink” before it reach him. Where Hajime was an instant before, smoke wrapped around the boss cockroach and the great tree.



With a moment free of Hajime, the boss calls for a group of cockroaches. A large amount of cockroaches rush into their own black smoke.



After a few seconds, the boss cockroach regained its form, removing the wounds and shaking off the black smoke. The tree behind the cockroach that had been exposed to black smoke had collapsed, seeping down the trunk as a gray mush. Apparently, the black smoke had some kind of corrosive effect.



The boss cockroach’s six wings began to shake at a high speed, BIIIIII! The boss cockroach took off at high speed. Hajime entered high speed flight to give the cockroach his regards once again, quickly overshadowing it simultaneously as the cockroach assumed a posture of struggle.



The accelerating Hajime circles around the cockroach again and rushes, blocking off its retreat. At the same time, a tsunami of cockroaches begin to slope up behind Hajme. While giving the cockroaches a smile as if he was saying “What is it, cutie?” he jerks out his left arm, he drew out some weapons. He had a mind to attack from the front while letting the cross bit attack from behind.



A wall of air appeared around the boss cockroach. It had made it to the speed of sound. They didn’t know if the branch passages would give way to the shockwave and vacuum and become destroyed. He also would be destroyed if he tried to avoid the tree at the last moment.



Still, Hajime showed no intention of leaving, even as the vibration smashed against his artificial arm. He attacked directly from the front.



Just then, a huge dragon of thunder and another clad in blue flames broke through the wall of cockroaches behind him and appeared.



Hajime feels it coming, and without looking back gives a face as if to say “Yuck.” However, the cockroach is already in sonic speed. The ‘blinking light’ perceptive abilities were already being stretched many times, and it was already hopeless.



“Why, I was!”



He delivered a single blow. An outburst of the elbow and “magic shockwave” mixed with fire at the same time, struck the boss cockroach straight on. The cockroach was also stretching its leg with a clawlike sharp blade, but was eluded completely with the intense cross counter. The face of the boss cockroach was pounded in detail with the effect of vibrations smashing and spreading across the creature in waves.



The impact on the front of the head caused the cockroach to round vertically and fly off in the direction of the day after tomorrow.



Immediately after, the roaches aiming for Hajime were consumed by Yue’s dragons in the spot Hajime just was.



“…. Thank you, removed.”



“Was that for me? Or those dear cockroach-kun.”



“… Of course, the yellow cockroaches.”



“Hey, what’s that? I’m getting things going. It looks like a new cockroach species?”



Hajime moved next to Yue, wearing an unhappy face. Yue floats a very hateful smile towards Hajime disdainfully. Hajime, who held up through the offensive of the thunder dragon and the blue flame dragon while narrowly escaping floated a blue vein on his forehead, but where does the wind blow?



“Your intention was to kill me.”



“… Of course not, at your level there was no reason to believe you’d be killed.”



“Oh, certainly, but could you have attacked worse than that?”



The two wore an atmosphere of disgust towards each other, being in a state where they dislike each other more than anyone, that’s the effects of the emotion reversal, yet still they were able to trust each other in combat.



The boss cockroach had approached the sonic speed while still wearing the black smoke of imperceptible corrosion. It turned out Yue could take it on easier from the front and engaged without thinking.



Furthermore, the large tsunami of cockroaches were approaching. If you looked closely, a small cockroach was wrapped in a black haze. The boss cockroach draws near from Yue’s side as the pair acknowledge the sea of corrosion.



“Hey you, that smoke decays everything. Don’t let it touch your clothing or things might become erotic.”



“… Perhaps for a rotten character like you. I’m sure I’m resistant.”



They spit venom at each other without hesitation, cutting words at close range.



Meanwhile, the black smoke coalesced into a black tidal wave of corrosion around the boss cockroach moving at sonic speeds, targeting Yue and Hajime in a manner that was anything but disordered.



However, it seemed like the two couldn’t be bruised.



The black smoke rushed in making a sonic boom, reaching out for the two people in front, and they instantly moved away, dancing around the streams of smoke as they glared at each other.



Their movements seemed impossible to follow, Hajime had drawn Donna and began firing while Yue used her finger as a baton, creating a dragon with the body of a tornado.



Six of Hajime’s bullets shot out in a flash, landing in the forehead of the boss cockroach at the same place and time. The boss cockroaches head explodes, and which is blown off, sending it into a tailspin once again.



Meanwhile the black tidal wave was engulfed with the colors of five dragons. The thunder dragon left only remnants of roaches while the blue dragon annihilated them completely. The ice dragon froze them while the stone dragon petrified them, 100,000 at a time.



“You’re playing through them quickly, will you run out?”



“… Even without material, I’ll play.”



While the cockroaches rain down like a torrential downpour, the boss continues to take in small cockroaches with each movement in a move that only feels desperate. Yue and Hajime’s voices could be heard, looking up with crescent shaped mouths and laughter like devils.



It probably wasn’t a conscious action. It was a more instinctual thing. It’s instinctually realized that it touched a presence that should never ever be touched and became an enemy.



“Gigi iiii!!”



The boss cockroach clad in the black smoke of corrosion began to panic and gave a scream. More small cockroaches were called, and as they approached the boss they became clad in the black corrosion as well before compressing.



The smoke seems to compress into a black shell, creating hundreds of shots. And of course, the shells maintain the corrosive properties. So the boss was creating corrosive ammunition out of the small cockroaches. Effects of the instantaneous corrosion and compression left an uneven smoke.



The boss released a shockwave, sending out the corrosive shells which struck and corroded a branch aisle the moment it was pierced. It headed for Hajime and the rest rapidly.



“…. Wasteful.”



Yue uttered a word. Shortly after, a gate forms right in front of Hajime and Yue and spreads. The spatial magic does a spatial field that becomes an invincible shield at the same time. The shell that would corrode anything the instant it lands, couldn’t avoid passing through the developed gate and disappearing into somewhere. It’s a perfectly wasteful ball as Yue had said.



But the boss cockroach, now in a complete state of panic can only half acknowledge that. Averting the orbit while screaming, it bypasses the gate to rush at Yue. However, the gate wasn’t simply a place to banish the cannonballs away.



“Kyiii!?”



Just after increasing its speed and detouring, it struck something in the air, and as it was caught it became a whole body crucifixion.



“Its movements are simple. Is its mind still only that of a cockroach?” Hajime murmurs so next to Yue as he makes his stone ring react.



The ring had been connected to the bola beforehand. The boss cockroach expected a route, its eyes on the gate while Hajime established the bola in the air simultaneously.



And the wire used for this bola is extra fine, so-called steel thread. Steel thread could be stretched as the effect given by generation magic “sign insulation” concealed an ore part of the bola, and a cobweb might be spread in the air.



The boss cockroach had rammed into the net, ready to catch it if the cockroach touched. And carefully, the bola matched the impact of the rush and entangled, securing the boss cockroach in the air as it is.



While spitting curses and strangely trusting each other, the pair continued to fight back to back without hesitation, sharing in the defense and attack without requiring a wink of conversation…



Were these guys really hating each other under the emotion reversal? If the boss cockroach could say words, it surely would have grandly Tsukkomi’d asking as such.



“I wonder, Yue…”



“… Hmm?”



Hajime inclines his neck while spearing the eye of the boss cockroach, continuing to harass it while it remained crucified in his web.



“I think my feelings of hate are starting to fade… it’s about halfway gone now. I’m able to stand it.”



“… coincidence. I also feel that Hajime is bearable. And with the cockroaches, I don’t feel the need to love them.”



“Oh, indeed.”



Tio guessed that the emotion reversal was another trial of the great labyrinth. Like the pleasure hell that chooses viscous liquid of milky slime, Hajime also inferred that it could be conquered. After all, it’d be a troublesome place if you’re feeling reverse could never be conquered and you ended up hating your partners forever.



However, Hajime and Yue fought together to overcome it by nature, or so it seems.



Potential? After having your spirit upset by feeling the reversal, and the cruel treatment center filled with making the boss cockroach, the feeling of turning back may be tempting.



Alternatively, it may be that the two of them exerted a simple and mysterious ability of creating pink space anytime, anywhere.



In any case, it reminded Hajime of a quote about “every time not being a possibility” that certain working authorities once murmured.



“Well, Yue, since you’re acting playfully, how about one last game with Mr. Cockroach?”



“… Nn. Winning is possible if you like your opponent.”



Again, two people show a smile that could only come from a devil. Absolutely, are we sure they had a feeling’s reversal? Is that really likely? An observer might have tsukkumi’d.



The boss cockroach has finished restoring its body and managed to sneak out of the bola’s restriction with the use of the black smoke of corrosion. It wore black smoke and again produces three to six shock waves and a vacuum blade with a flap of its wings.



However, the boss cockroach shouldn’t be negligent. Up to this moment, Hajime had been pulling his hand. He refused to use heinous weapons, no direct attacks by powerful magic. Not even attack while playing. He was playing to the full level.



Things that were not perceived were the complete lack of aggressive intention. Demon or not, the creatures body showed the miserable result.



Hajime appeared at the back of the boss cockroach, inserting centrifugal force with body strengthening, hammering down with an aerial turning kick into the back of the boss cockroach with an instant move.



“Giiiii!?”



The boss cockroach which made a noise curved like a shrimp with its shell in the air and blew away. The black smoke of corrosion should have been worn, but with Hajime covered in bright red magic, it did not seem to affect him at all.



Blown away at intense Gs, the boss cockroach desperately tried to regain its balance. Yue appears from a spatial change right in front of the boss cockroach, waving her had slightly in front of it.



Immediately after, space become Gyobo! A shock wave with some directionality makes a noise, and shrinks, and generates the power by which space turns back at the next moment.



“GIIII!?”



The boss cockroach which is assaulted by a dreadful impact from the front like a pinball this time blows off in the direction of the day after tomorrow. The surface of the body is ragged already, but that’s just the start.



Hajime had already moved position. Once again, an intense kick blows the cockroach away. Blown away, and still, to Yue, blown again. Back to Hajime.



Hajime and Yue hit each other, such as the air tennis with a boss cockroach ball. Echoing are the heartbreaking cries of the boss cockroach in the vast underground space. The boss is moving so fast and irregularly that the swarms of cockroaches are unable to have time to help.



The corrosive smoke doesn’t affect Hajime and doesn’t touch Yue to begin with. Yue’s body is able to repair any damage before she’s even aware, so there is no risk of dying.



Their play seems to be the doing of devils and fiends. Using up and playing with their love by this trial in the labyrinth might have turned them into such.



Further, a rule of the game is loss of the person who failed in the rally first.



“…. Hajime.”



And, in the middle of their rally, suddenly received sense talk from Yue. Because they are moving at high speed with changing distances, this was necessary. Hajime replies while flicking the boss cockroach with an overhead kick.



“What happened?”



“Oh,… Hajime.”



“Mm. What is it?”



“Hajime… Hajime… Hajime… Nn….”



Yue just kept calling Hajime’s name repeatedly by sense talk for a while. The tone seemed to be changing into something more spoiled like. Hajime begins to notice it in the tone. In the feeling.



“Yue, back?”



“… Nn… perfection. For Hajime?”



“Yes, me too… there is only pure malice for this cockroach any more, and for Yue…”



“…. Me?”



Hajime packs in a word without leaving a torrent of the feelings taken away. Such as having the opposite feeling for Yue even for just a moment. He didn’t want to think about it. The violent malice as well as the anger for the boss cockroach rose up once again, but he had to say the words to his sweetheart where there were once cruel words.



When he took a deep breath, Hajime used sense talk while looking at Yue, who had changed ahead of the boss cockroach and blew it straight for Hajime.



“There is only love.”



“Nn… me too.”



The voice that seems wonderful and sounds dear to Hajime. Feelings of thousands of emotions were included and the word floods through his chest. Hajime and Yue stay in the air just as it is, saying only those words with patience even if it has to be seen. The boss cockroach with discharged body fluid flied overhead, but the two people’s eyes don’t look away. It was just Yue and Hajime.



They say nothing, when the distance between them disappear, and two people embrace in midair. Their lips meet naturally. Light kiss without words, only just touch, as if the thought was more than enough.



Hajime holds Yue’s slender waist and Yue wraps her arm around Hajime. Their lips release as the two of them confirm that the feelings inside them are normal once again, staring close distance, with smiles on their faces.



The boss cockroach which had finished playing around at that point gave them some distraction. With a scream, it dispatched cockroaches which rised up simultaneously.



That won’t be the light one such as tidal waves any more. They were forcibly trying to close the space with cockroaches. A huge dome began to form heading up towards Yue and Hajime. Hajime had long since lost track of what happened to Kouki and the others.



The dome was filled with black smoke of corrosion. When seen from the outside, the surface seemed to rustle, the mountain rising where it could be seen. The underground space where the big tree was made at the center was buried with a mountain of cockroaches, mostly.



The cockroaches had managed to accumulate not just at the bottom, but also the ceiling and walls as well. If someone said all the cockroaches in the world were gathered here, it’d not be surprising.



And the space was closing quickly with cockroaches in the next moment GoGYUUU! It was reduced quickly with the sounds that suggested so.



Will they be crushed to death or captured inside of the ocean of cockroaches? The center is of course Yue and Hajime. At the end of the underground space, there was Shia striking down a medium-sized cockroach and leaving it for Kouki’s group to defeat. They also seem to have exceeded the pile of cockroaches a short while ago. It also seems to come off from an area by a compressed thing.



The boss cockroach is entering a reduced sphere directly while flapping. Closed space of a hug cockroach was in the compressed state so that there were no gaps to the interior already.



“Gichichichichichichichi!”



The boss cockroach makes an unpleasant sound. That seemed to be an attempt to clear it’s former humiliation as a ball, and it seemed to be the roar convinced of a victory.



But that will be overturned immediately after. A cockroach was repelled from a spherical center, trying to find the dead body from the center of the sphere of cockroaches.



“Oh, you want a fervent embrace?”



Yue, putting both hands together, was seen there with her eyes closed to concentrate. Next to her is Hajime, who laughs dauntlessly within the 4 point barrier.



The boss cockroach stops, instinctively taking a step back.



The fear of being teased by these two people ran deep, but that’s because the power they exuded was feared above all else.



A gap formed that Yue could put out both hands together. They flash blue, and in the meantime a small group of flames begin to swirl around.



When seeing that, they seem to have just done the flame systems finest aggressive spell “blue sky”. When ordinarily thinking, making “blue sky” can excel in some small extermination. It’d seem like an insignificant act.



But genius magician Yue wouldn’t do such a nonsense thing.



The blue flame between the two hands, the splendor is increased from moment to moment. On the contrary, it kept burning. It’s as if looking to crate small stars.



“… Selection.” Yue muttered quietly.



Then, the finished fist-sized orb oozes blue aura.



The bead of blue flame which contains a power and identity that was unknown.



That one was for the boss cockroach. The cockroach realized it’d be completely destroyed. If not, they’d make it understand. The cockroach let out a scream, pushing cockroaches and black smoke against the four point boundary to break it and kill the pair and break the orb before it was too late.



However, the action was too late too. Well no, whatever action the cockroach would take would be the same thing. There’s no way to stop it now.



Yue hung the blue flame orb towards the sky. Yue illuminated Blue Star gave its own appearance that was far too mysterious and beautiful. Hajime gently hugged Yue’s body from behind. Yue had entrusted her back to Hajime to fawn after all.



And,



“… Divine flame.”



Like the judgement of god himself, the pulsating blue overran the entire place.





Chapter 132




Translation Note: FYI, When Tio talks, the MTL translate it that she refers the Hajime as “Husband” and herself as his “concubine” or “whore”. I’ve been changing it to “Master” and “Mistress” because I think it fits the S&M theme a little better as well as the other translations.



_________________________________________



“Divine Flame,” she commanded in a pretty voice edged with cruelty.



Shortly after, the function of the annihilation magic became apparent.



The blue flame began to pulsate with a Dukan sound. Blue light spread around the underground space and began to swell from inside. As the ripples spread like ripple of water triggered by a drop of water, there seemed to be an ominous quite that was devoid of mercy.



The cockroaches that were touched by the blue light did not offer even the slightest resistance, merely disappearing without even ash remaining.



At the sight of this divine flame, the boss cockroach ran like a scared rabbit, a scream was caught in the light of the spreading blue that ballooned away from Yue before the boss cockroach unceremoniously disappeared without another sound.



Without the boss cockroach, the small and medium cockroaches that were being fought by Shia and Kouki’s group became confused at the loss of leadership, and became trivial nuisances. The blue light continued to spread, it swallowed the cockroaches around Shia as well.



As the flame spread out, Kouki and the others watched it approach with anxious looks.



It wasn’t unreasonable for them to feel rushed. They were able to see the destruction in front of them.



The reason was clear. Kouki, Shia, and the others weren’t sure whether the flame that destroyed the cockroaches so completely would hurt them as well. However, it was not simply Shia and the rest that remained unharmed. The large tree trunk and branches remained intact as well.



They gave Hajime and Yue surprised looks when they realized that the flame that spread across the underground space and completely devastated the cockroaches only affected those cockroaches.



–Divine Flame



A flame type superlative magic which shot “blue flames” rapidly 10 times into the space around and compressed it with gravity magic. Yue further specified the magic with “selection” using spirit magic, so that it avoided those whom contained souls. (Translation Note: Cockroaches don’t go to heaven)



Anyone Yue permits survives while it seeks out those she sets as an enemy.



That is, indeed, suitable to be called art. It wouldn’t be unreasonable to say that a god named Yue passed judgement from heaven.



“Unexpected magic… Indeed expected from Yue.”



“Nn… Praise me more, please?”



As the light of the flames started to go out, the voices of the two of them echoed in the underground space.



Indeed Yue showed some signs of exhaustion, so Hajime gave Yue a big hug in reward for her hard work. Yue wrapped her arms around Hajime’s neck and allowed her entire body to relax against him. And just like that, she kissed his neck, followed by the sound of sucking as she bit and lapped up his blood.



“When saying it like that, I wonder who won this match.”



While Yue stuck to the scruff of Hajime’s neck and drank his blood, he held her with one arm, while gently stroking her hair with the other. And so he was reminded of and questioned the outcome of the game the pair of them had started.



“…. Nn, haa… Nn. My win. Hajime will not disagree.”



Yue separates from Hajime with an ecstatic expression, her eyes were as bewitching as always as she licked her lips.



“Yue, I must ask, does it really matter how won or lost, does it mean so much?”



“… Hehe. Well, then, I guess we can put that aside for now.”



As the pair of them spoke casually, discussing things ‘just in case’, there came another loud voice.



“Are you guys going to flirt forever, or can you rejoin the rest of us!”



“Yes! Yue is cheating! Hajime-kun and I are… anyway, please return!”



It was Shia and Kaori. They were beckoning us to return right alongside Kouki and the rest. Tio merely shrugged her shoulders. They were trying to take their feelings into account and had been waiting. Kouki and the others looked a bit uncomfortable, Suzu and Shizuku had their eyes lowered and blushes on their cheeks. It looked like they had been watching Yue and Hajime from a distance.



From their reactions, it looked like their feelings had returned to normal as well. Hajime didn’t know if they had returned under their own power or if it was the result of the boss cockroach dying.



The pair stared at each other and gave another light kiss before returned to a place beside Shia.



“You kissed so casually at the end…”



“I’m envious… but… but… It’s good to see you’re safe. Although I felt like… “not only you!” or “me too!” but I don’t want to sound selfish…”



“Indeed, as expected of Yue and Hajime. Battling in a world alone, tossing him around like a toy, it wasn’t as pitiful as expected.” (Translation Note: I think this is Tio claiming she wishes she was the boss cockroach getting kicked around by Hajime, lol).



There were three people which came away with three different responses, but it was Shia’s words that had the biggest impact. Hajime gives her a hug with one hand without releasing Yue. She doesn’t seem to mind at all. However, Kouki and company wore mixed expressions over his nerve.



“… Did you recover your feelings on your own?”



“You could say I return on the way, yes…”



“Would, um. May I ask that you had returned to normal without help?”



Kaori looks doubtful about Yue’s question to Shia. Tio adds the explanation while forcing a smile.



“You may say that I also returned without help. I assume that the trigger was jealousy over the war declaration between master and Yue? This mistress was envious of their fervent love. However, soon they did not even bother with the cockroaches, just each other…. Was that the same for Shia and Kaori as well?”



“Yes, it was…”



“Yup…”



So it was that sort of thing. Hajime glanced over to Kouki’s group to see how they were doing.



“……” X3



“Well, -how is it? The last cockroach to die was back to being unpleasant.”



Shizuku appeared to be the only one to recover on her own. It was expected of Shizuku given her mental strength. Kouki and the others must have received even more damage as they had to watch their lovable cockroaches die all the way to the very end.



A bit later, Shia was asking Yue about the magic from a short while ago. Suddenly, a portion of the large tree near the ceiling started shining. While helping Kouki’s party recover from their damages, Hajime observed a Mekimeki sound, followed by a giant branch which began to grow anew.



The branch created a new aisle as its length increase little by little. Hajime and the others remained in the four point aisle from the start of the cockroach attack until the fifth branch joined up to their intersection. The branch aisle had come from the ceiling, so it took the form of a stairway which led them up the branch to the heavens.



After a brief look at each other, Hajime and the rest hurried to follow the newly formed path.



However, Yue was holding Hajime tightly. Yue wouldn’t let go and Hajime didn’t try to separate. That was fine, afterall. However, Kaori also pulled from the left while a sullen Shia pulled from the right. Meanwhile, Tio clung from the back. It goes without saying that Kouki and company watched this with indescribable expressions.



When they finished climbing the fifth branch aisle, they entered another cave-like room. Hajime remained on his guard and before long a magic circle glowed and they found themselves teleported once again.



After the light settled, they could see that they were in a garden that spread out right in front of them.



The sky felt alarmingly close.



The air seemed clean. The ground spread out to roughly the size of high school gymnasium. There were trees which were relatively small and a small chalky building which had various waterways spreading out from it.



Twines surrounded the largest tree, which sat in a small island circled by canals, a central stone lithograph sitting at its base.



Tio walked into the garden, peeping over the edge.



“What do you think, master? It looks to be the top of the tree here.”



Others glance towards the bottom from the end of the garden after Tio’s word too. It’s a vast sea of clouds and an unmistakable thick fog spread out under their eyes.



“Hey, this is strange. When we flew over the sea of trees, we had crossed the dense woodland and saw no tree this big. No tree could crest the thick fog, this height must be up over 200 meters at least. It’s impossible to be seeing from a tree this high.” (Translation Note: To put that in perspective, the largest skyscrapers are around 450 meters, so they’re high, but not that high. On the other hand, the world’s tallest tree is only ~116 meters)



Hajime noticed the humor of his remark after saying it. After all, the upper part sticking out from the thick fog would only be natural, especially considering the size of the tree as seen from the ground expanding across the dense woodland.



Nevertheless, you would think that the large trees size would have been verifiable before now.



“… I see. It is concealing magic which is doing this?”



“… It is, like some kind of shadow system form of spirit magic… or is it just shifting space?”



Yue considered the magic based on Hajime’s inference. If it’s shadow magic, there should be some form of recognition obstruction, but the scaling is strange. If this were like spirit magic, they would be conscious of the alterations being made with the magic of the soul. However, they weren’t aware of any discomfort, which would be impossible considering Yue’s skill.



Hajime and his group wore impressed looks. Although they had experienced a number of trials and had managed to keep the nastiness to a minimum, there was still the liberator. Although ordinarily, the liberators did not seem ill-natured.



“Is this the goal here?” Hajime muttered.



This caused Kouki and the others to where startled expressions. “Here…. Finally…”



Hajime ignored them and walked directly to the lithograph.



The group crossed a pretty arch and entered a yen-like small island circled by a channel. The lithograph began to glow as they approached, the bright green magic flowing into the channel. So it functioned like a magic circle? Phosphorescence like fireflies raised flickeringly.



The sense to probe a memory and then inscribe knowledge by force. Hajime and the others were familiar with this. A raised voice groaned as some one else behind him was “struck” with shock and a sense of discomfort.



As the knowledge flowed into Hajime, the tree began to entangle around the lithograph and swell.



Hajime and the others assume a posture of struggle. The shape of the tree began to change, tearing away branches as it formed. Phosphorescence rose away from Hajime, forming into the image of a person’s face in the middle of the trunk. It takes on a female appearance from the shoulders up.



The person’s form is complete; the woman’s eyes open. Then, the mouth opens gently.



“First of all, I’d like to say congratulations. You’ve defeated several of the great labyrinths. I am Luluo Haltina, and I prepared the Haltina (Sea of Trees) Great Labyrinth. I apologize for the very difficult trials I prepared with the maximum regard.”



She seemed to have used the tree as a medium for her recording. This was the form instead of Oscar’s “pictures”. Luluo felt dignified like she might be connected to some form of royalty. Although some of that feeling may come from the tree stem itself, which split around her like hair, and contained a certain kind of beauty.



“However, it is also necessary. If you came through the dungeons of the other liberators, then you know about our relationship with the gods, the past tragedy, and what’s happening right now. Therefore, I wanted you the learn something about the unwavering bond that can’t be swayed, a heart that can’t be shaken. I think you who arrived here surely understand something about the strength of the heart as well as its weaknesses. I’m wishing sincerely that that is of assistance to you in the future.”



Shia listened to Luluo Haltina’s talk with a meek face. But Hajime was already impatient. He didn’t need pretentious excuses. For once, however, he quietly read the air.



“I do not know for what purpose you sought my magic, -“sublimation” magic, you are free to use it as you see fit. However, stick to your bonds, and do not drown in power.”



Hajime was already looking around restlessly. How is it? Even if he watched it, it wouldn’t change anything. He was already considering removing the lithograph to shut her off and move on already.



“My god level magic “sublimation” is the power to make everything evolve. That is the knowledge that is given. But, true value of this magic is found elsewhere.”



Hajime’s eyes widened for a moment. The hand that was hovering over Donner was returned to his side, and his eyes rested on Luluo. The real value of sublimation magic wasn’t given in the knowledge. Tell me that first! Hajime pointed a blaming look.



“Sublimation magic makes the “power” of everything be sublimated, literally. The other god-level magics are no exception for that…. Gravity magic, spirit magic, alteration, space magic… these mighty forces are the foundation of the management. All of which lead to further evolution… even when combined with each other. This magic would be better called “Magic concepts”.



Someone made a gulping sound, resonating the desire for such a magic.



Hajime also had his eyes opened wide in surprise. At one time, in Miledi’s Raisen’s labyrinth, she suggested that if he obtained all the god’s level magic, he might be able to find something that would grant his desires. He needed to obtain god generation magic. It probably meant this.



“Concept magic – is the meaning which is just as it sounds. The magical manifestation of how magic acts in this world. Even if you obtain the god-level magic, it cannot be used so easily, because concept magic is invented by utmost will, not theory.”



So that was the reason it couldn’t be copied by magical circle.



After hearing the explanation, Hajime frowned. “Utmost will”… if it’s an explanation done so lightly.



“We seven liberators worked over the course of decades and only managed three magical concepts. However, that was enough for us… but which one will you need?”



Just as Luluo said so, the lithographic center slides and something like a pocket watch comes out from the inside. Hajime takes it into his hand. One needle of the same length was fixed on a plate in the center of the semitransparent lid. On the backside was a pattern painted in the form Luluo Haltina used. Apparently, it also serves as a proof of capture. Luluo resumed her explanation.



“For the name, it’s called the “compass of desire”. The concept that, when activated, shows the place I desired.” (Translation Note: Pirate’s of the Caribbean anyone? Drink up, my me hearties you ho!)



Hajime heard the explanation and his heart skipped a beat.



“The place I desired is shown.” That means…



“It will lead you to the location to want to go. Anything, anywhere, be it hidden or – even in another world.”



“……”



The “different world” Luluo is talking about will be the world by which the Mad Gods reside. The liberators must have used concept magic out of utmost will. To beat the gods, of course.



Therefore, this compass was produced to find the place where god was. Hajime was certain Oscar helped make this compass using the concept magic as well as his generation magic.



But – it should also be possible to use this compass to show them how to return to Japan.



A means to return home was found… delight welled in Hajime’s chest like he might burst. Yue clenched his hand and gave him a firm squeeze, looking up at him gently.



“To get all the god’s magic, if that is your goal, you’ll be able to travel anywhere. I wish you to move forward with free will and find happiness in your life. Good luck for your future.”



Luluo had come to the end of her words after giving her speech, all that was left was the tree with the entangled lithograph.



They remained immersed in the afterglow in silence as if chewing on the events that just happened to their satisfaction. Only the sound of the rustling of leaves as the wind blew gently affected their vicinity.



It was Hajime that broke the stillness, asking Yue with a monotonous tone of controlled emotion. “Yue, just to hear it, using the magic of sublimation, combined with spatial magic. Can we cross to another world?”



Startled movements spread across Kouki’s group behind him.



Yue understood the weight of those words and the exploration of that potential. And with the strongest magic user with the knowledge of the god’s inscribed in her mind, she searched for a solution.



As result, she obtained the answer…



“…. I’m sorry.”



“Really…”



Just that. If the world can be exceeded simply by mixing spatial magic with sublimation, then certainly the liberators wouldn’t have had so much trouble, too.



Luluo has said that there were three concept magics that had been produced. The first concept was given to the “compass of desire”. It would stand to reason that the other concepts would be the concept to go to another world and the concept to overthrow the gods.



In other words, when not attaining to concept magic, the idea of leaving the world is difficult.



Yue was hanging her head dejectedly at being unable to meet Hajime’s expectations. Hajime gave her a kind smile and combed his fingers quietly through her beautiful gold hair. Yue seemed ticklish, looking upward at Hajime and shrugging her shoulders as he ran his fingers over her skin.



“It’s no problem. I was being greedy. It was just a thought. We just need more god-level magic. We just need to get the right one, and you’ll definitely be able to figure it out, so don’t have such a face.”



The heart that was impatient at the thought they might be able to return had already recovered its poise, and Hajime shrugs his shoulders with the expressions he had to spare. In answer to whether Yue was relieved at his recovery, like usual she snuggled close to him.



“Cough, Cough. Well… is Yue and Hajime back to normal? I think a shortcut formed for us to return to entrance. So less lovey dovey for now!”



Shia, while looking at Yue and Hajime, interrupted their pink space while saying “Yes, as always”, certainly in one corner of the garden the magic circle appeared. As Shia suggested that would be the shortcut to descend back to the ground level.



After checking the magic circle, Hajime strokes Shia’s bunny ears to correct some of her sulkiness. Then Kouki starts to speak up.



“Oh… hey, Nagumo. A short while ago when… you received the concept magic…”



“Yeah… we should be able to return now. At least, this compass will tell me where to head next.”



“Really…”



Kouki wore an expression as if hope was lost. Ryuutaro, Shizuku, and Suzu also wore feelings that looked ready to explode, like they might start crying at any second. They were hesitating over the lack of getting the god-level magic, but only because Hajime was there for the moment. It seemed like they would have to depend on Hajime.



“The, a, as for that, Nagumo. When returning…”



Suzu tries to ask Hajime about something.



Even if she didn’t say it, it was possible to guess. They remembered Hajime’s indifference to his classmates. That they might only be able to return if Hajime does it for them… Reserve goes out when perfect salvation depends on the benevolence of another being straight through.



Suzu, as the typical mood manufacturer, was either in a good place or a bad place as she tried to talk and stir around the subject of returning home. The thought was they could return naturally too, but… that was groundless, and… Well, Hajime didn’t hate this kind of thing.



“Be relieved. There won’t be any capacity restrictions or demerits. I’ll return everyone if I can.”



“It is, taken along or… eehehe. Thank you, Nagumo-san.”



“For the fact that you had so little confidence. You didn’t really do anything, did you?”



“Ugh!”



Kouki, Ryuutaro, and Suzu hang their heads to their chests.



With just sublimation magic, the ability of every magic can be raised a bit. Of course, when you already had god-level magic, the necessity to sublimate it would look more like a limit breakthrough without the side effects, so there would also be some restrictions. Like Rebirth without the side effects or something like that.



Still, they seemed unconfident. It should be said that they couldn’t get sublimation magic. But also that it could be expected. It was that the tests were flawed and exploitable that they made it to the end in the first place.



But as such, Kouki and the others hanged their heads. Still, one person tried to follow awkwardly with the circumstances.



“Yaegashi… you seem to be able to use the new magic?” Hajime asked.



“!… Oh, I think that, I can use it, yes.”



“Ho! Is that true?”



“That was really it? You’ve learned it?”



“Indeed, Shizu, Shizu! Suzu’s Bride!”



This also could be expected. Shizuku had been through the pleasure hell, a dream of the ideal world, and having her feelings reversed all without help. Even if her battle ability wasn’t enough, the god-level magic was worth getting just from the mental power she had to fight through.



It was heartwarming, but it seemed like Suzu was the only one who appreciated that fact purely. Ryuutaro wore a mortified expression while Kouki wore ominous shadows in his expressions while he praised with a smiling face.



Shizuku watched Kouki with an anxious look at that.



“Anyway, back to Fair Bergen again. Slowly. Hordes of cockroaches was light trauma. Serious mental damage. Yue needs to heal with spirit.”



“Kufufufu. I’ll fix you right up.”



“I, I too! I’ll put my head on your lap, too! Yue’s already done enough! I’m on top of this!”



“It’s because everything is done! Because everything is done! I say it twice because it’s important!”



“The tired master should step on mistress! It’ll be good. I make the mistress chair replacement so you can relax. Do you have a firm foothold separately? You may stamp as much as you like?”



As Hajime walked to the magic circle while cuddling with Yue, Shia and the rest crowd around him from left, right, and behind.



Hajime wrapped a hand around Shia’s arm while giving a little laugh. Shia gives a start, but seems happy and grasps back. Kaori and Tio think Shia is given priority somehow and turn to look at her with envious eyes.



Shizuku follows behind watching the view with a bright expression while considering the possibility of going home.



One boy wore a smile and chose to understand it that way at least, and thus the capture of one of the seven great labyrinths, the Sea of Trees, was complete.





Chapter 133




The depths of the forest of Fair Bergen felt particularly peaceful and calming that morning.



The twitter of a nearby bird stirred in the air like a ripple across the water’s surface. It seemed to be a gentle music, floating along with the tone of rustling leaves.



However, in a particularly unremarkable part of Fair Bergen out of public eye, there sounded a different kind of noise.



Hugh! Hugh! Hugh!



“Up! Hah! Oh! “



It was sharp sound of air splitting combined with short breaths. With each sound, a black line cut through the air, splitting the morning fog. The black sword moved naturally through the air like flowing water.



The sword wielder’s movements were extremely refined, and when combined with her flowing black hair, resembled a dance dedicated to the gods.



The black sword and black hair moved near the path of a falling leaf, arcing in a circular pattern. The leaf fell within the sword’s path and was immediately dispersed, beads of sweat scattering into the mist.



For how many hours did she dance with the earth? The ground was carved with her footprints, and there were an immeasurable number of destroyed leaves at her feet.



However, her blurred form moved tirelessly, fighting against her own exhaustion. Her form was innocent, yet beautiful to behold, each strike with the sword performed in earnest.



“—hah.”



Shizuku’s eternal blade dance suddenly met disorder. Her sword missed the leaf by a quarter of an inch. The centrifugal force of her spin caused her to lose her balance.



Shizuku barely managed to avoid tumbling. With a bitter face, she put the black sword to her side.



“Hah, hah, well…”



Shizuku shook her head in irritation. Her trademark raven-black ponytail whipped left to right, echoing her sentiment.



“Clear your mind, clear as water.”



Taking a deep breath, she remembered to put her mind at peace and to calm her heart. It was an exercise she had learned in Japan while she practiced fencing. Shizuku’s troubled heart regained its tranquility quickly.



However, the figure of a boy emerged from that calmness…



“Nuaaa!!!”



While gallantly shouting in an unlady-like manner, she swung her black sword as if to beat away at the image in her mind.



“Different, different! That is why! It’s different!”



The waters of her mind were turbulent, not a single sense of calm anywhere. Like a typhoon ravaging the sea, Shizuku’s mind rampaged.



“This is all different, and I don’t know the meaning. I’m calm, I’m cool.”



By all odds, she was far from calm. Her heart seemed to scream at her incoherently.



In fact, she had spent the entire day trying to calm herself, but her sword wouldn’t listen, the state of her mind shown in its choppy movements and her negligent footwork.



She was trying to shake off the disturbance in her heart with discipline and training.



Why, it wouldn’t be an exaggeration to say Shizuku spent all night focusing on that.



Yesterday, Hajime and the rest had returned from the Haltina Great Labyrinth and chose to rest immediately. Shizuku got a meal and a bath before immediately going to bed, of course. However, she couldn’t sleep for some reason, her mind turbid. Though it was midnight, she left her bed, the black sword in hand.



And it was that boy who kept rising to the surface of her mind, causing her to suffer the mental anguish when idle.



“Sie! Sie! See!!!”



Her shout got rougher after each strike.



It was the unpleasant events of the large labyrinth that she couldn’t avoid thinking about.



It had started after they were brought into that world of dreams. When Shizuku remembered the sweet world, it caused her to blush, but it was also painful… Her ideal world… was something she could never tell anyone.



She tried to reject the inner maiden within her heart.



“Uryaaa!!!”



This caused her to think about the final trial of the great labyrinth. The unexpected content of her reversed feelings. It wasn’t the fact that she had felt love for the black creatures. No, it was her extreme dislike for a certain boy… she didn’t have the urge to kill him, but her thoughts were certainly hateful.



That is…



“It’s different. Friendship. It’s friendship Bonzai!”



She lost her composure with the sword. It seemed to stem from the collapse of her character. The black sword swung in vain, the wind switching around crudely. Shizuku grimaced in displeasure as the shadow of that boy floated in her vision like a phantom, a hateful smile on his face. If one of her classmates saw this, they’d be shocked.



Shizuku continued to swing the sword recklessly, trying to bring back the peace and remove her confusion. To shake off and deny it. She wanted to convince herself that it was all a misunderstanding.



With fatigue setting in, Shizuku’s feelings started to regain their original stillness. As to the cause of her turmoil, that was of course the nature of the Great Labyrinth, an eccentric environment that created a temporary loss of propriety. Her heart finally settled down, even if she thought about him. Back to normal.



“Fuaaa!”



She slowly expels a breath. She closed her eyes and remained in the darkness, sweat dripping down her pail skin, an eloquent sight to the morning. With her body wet, hair sticking to her cheeks, hot breath coming from her lips, it can only be described as slightly sexy.



As Shizuku indulged in the lingering calmness, a voice spoke up.



“As I’d expect from Shizuku.”



“Ahh!?”



Shizuku’s heart jumped through her throat at the sound of a familiar voice. The tone disturbed her peace. The thought “How is this expected?” came without anyone to tsukkomi. Shizuku glanced back at the voice with these turbulent thoughts in her mind.



The expected person, Hajime, stood there. She had not felt any sign of his approach through her training.



“Naguma-kun. Don’t scare me like that, it is poor tastes to stand behind me.”



Shizuku gave a smile while her heart pounded and throbbed uncomfortably.



Confronting Hajime while he took her chastising…



“… Have… Pufu!”



“!!”



Her chastising was repeated but only received laughter. He could only react to her colorful criticism with humor. However, because her cheeks were dyed slightly, her statement had very little weight.



That awareness is like a splinter hurled at her consciousness.



“And you… you…”



Hajime, still slightly laughing at her remark, gives an apology and tosses her a towel from his treasure warehouse. Realizing that she was covered in sweat, she began to wipe herself with a surge of panic and a strange sense of embarrassment.



“I wasn’t looking to disturb you. I just woke up early. I was looking for a suitable place to train and came across Yaegashi. I wanted to see how you’re doing. Are you doing well?”



“I am… I just couldn’t get any sleep.”



“Well, you did conquer your first large labyrinth. I suppose you’re still excited?”



“Oh, well…”



It was certainly exciting in a different way, and there was an increase in strength. However, Shizuku couldn’t say it and averted her eyes.



The suspicious act caused Hajime to narrow his eyes and tilt his head with a puzzled look.



Shizuku ended up losing more of her composure.



She looked restless, uncomfortable, fidgety…



“… Yaegashi, have you been feeling any strangeness, any aftereffects?”



“Oh? You could say I’m fine. Yes, completely healthy! Rather, in the best condition.”



“If you say so… but you like very tired, and you’re acting suspicious.”



“Suspicious behavior? Coming from you? I am ordinary! You’re the one who is standing behind people thoughtlessly!”



“You’re usually cool as ice (tl: he refers to her as a hitman)… always calm…”



Though Shizuku was obviously not normal, she insisted she was, so Hajime decided to stop worrying about it. He put on that kind of look before approaching Shizuku.



Shizuku suddenly panicked at Hajime’s sudden approach. She pushed both hands out in front to put up a barrier between the two of them.



“What? Why are you coming towards me? Please wait a moment. Sweaty! Territory Violation! Calm down! You want the towel? But it’s all… Not good. I’ll return it once it’s washed! So please stop!”



“… Something is definitely wrong… I only want to see your black sword.”



As Hajime approached her, the attitude Shizuku presented while stepping backwards was that as if she was being approached by a pervert.



“Oh? My Black sword? Something like that…”



“I can reinforce it. It’s something I figured out thanks to the sublimation magic. If you’d rather I didn’t, that’s fine…”
